Kentucky, session 2025RS, HB798.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
Section 1. KRS 196.175 is amended to read as follows:
(1) As used in this section:
(a) "Certified professional midwifery services" has the same meaning as in
KRS 314.400; and
(b) "Doula services" means services provided by a trained doula who provides
physical, emotional, and educational support, but not medical care, to
mothers before, during, and after childbirth. Doula services include but are
not limited to:
1. Support and assistance during labor and childbirth;
2. Prenatal and postpartum education;
3. Breastfeeding assistance;
4. Parenting education; and
5. Support in the event that a woman has been or will become separated
from her child.
(2) For any inmate housed in a jail, penitentiary, or local or state correctional or
detention facility, residential center, or reentry center who is known to be pregnant:
(a)[(1)] The facility shall provide the inmate notice of, access to, and a written
application for community-based programs serving pregnant, birthing, or
lactating inmates. At a minimum, the notice shall contain how to qualify for
the programs as well as timelines for applying and the process for appealing a
denial. If a community-based program accepts the inmate but is denied access
to the facility, the facility shall provide to the inmate, in writing within fifteen
(15) days of the request, the safety or security concerns for the inmate, infant,
public, or staff that led to the denial;[.]
(b)[(2)] The facility shall refer the inmate to a social worker who shall:
Page 1 of 2
XXXX 2/18/2025 2:19 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1818
1.[(a)] Discuss with the inmate the options available for feeding,
placement, and care of the infant, including the benefits of lactation;
2.[(b)] Provide the inmate access to a phone to contact family regarding
placement of the infant; and
3.[(c)] Oversee the placement of the infant; and[.]
(c)[(3)] For up to seventy-two (72) hours after the birth, the facility shall ensure
that:
1.[(a)] The infant is allowed to remain with the inmate, unless a medical
professional determines that doing so would pose a health or safety risk
to the inmate or infant; and
2.[(b)] The inmate has access to nutritional or hygiene-related products
necessary to care for the infant, including but not limited to diapers.
Such products shall be provided free of charge to indigent inmates.
(3) For any inmate housed in a jail, penitentiary, or local or state correctional or
detention facility, residential center, or reentry center who is known to be
pregnant or who has given birth in the last six (6) weeks:
(a) The facility shall provide reasonable accommodations for the provision of
certified professional midwifery services or doula services; and
(b) Persons providing certified professional midwifery services or doula services
shall be:
1. Granted appropriate facility access;
2. Allowed to attend and provide assistance during labor and childbirth
where feasible; and
3. Granted access to the inmate's relevant health care information if the
inmate authorizes disclosure.
Page 2 of 2
XXXX 2/18/2025 2:19 PM Jacketed